Washington statutes.
RCW 35.72.020

Reimbursement by other property owners—Contract requirements.

(1) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (2) of this section, the contract may provide for the partial reimbursement to the owner or the owner's assigns for a period not to exceed fifteen years of a portion of the costs of the project by other property owners who:

(a) Are determined to be within the assessment reimbursement area pursuant to RCW 35.72.040;

(b) Are determined to have a reimbursement share based upon a benefit to the property owner pursuant to RCW 35.72.030;

(c) Did not contribute to the original cost of the street project; and

(d) Subsequently develop their property within the period of time that the contract is effective and at the time of development were not required to install similar street projects because they were already provided for by the contract.

Street projects subject to reimbursement may include design, grading, paving, installation of curbs, gutters, storm drainage, sidewalks, street lighting, traffic controls, and other similar improvements, as required by the street standards of the city, town, or county.

(2)(a) The contract may provide for an extension of the fifteen-year reimbursement period for a time not to exceed the duration of any moratorium, phasing ordinance, concurrency designation, or other governmental action that prevents making applications for, or the approval of, any new development within the benefit area for a period of six months or more.

(b) Upon the extension of the reimbursement period pursuant to (a) of this subsection, the contract must specify the duration of the contract extension and must be filed and recorded with the county auditor. Property owners who are subject to the reimbursement obligations under subsection (1) of this section shall be notified by the appropriate county, city, or town of the extension filed under this subsection.

(3) Each contract shall include a provision requiring that every two years from the date the contract is executed a property owner entitled to reimbursement under this section provide the appropriate county, city, or town with information regarding the current contract name, address, and telephone number of the person, company, or partnership that originally entered into the contract. If the property owner fails to comply with the notification requirements of this subsection within sixty days of the specified time, then the contracting county, city, or town may collect any reimbursement funds owed to the property owner under the contract. Such funds must be deposited in the capital fund of the county, city, or town.

[ 2006 c 88 s 1; 1983 c 126 s 2.]